Washington statutes.
RCW 9.27.015

Interference, obstruction of any court, building, or residence—Violations.

Whoever, interfering with, obstructing, or impeding the administration of justice, pickets or parades in or near a building housing a court of the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof, or in or near a building or residence occupied or used by such judge, juror, witness, or court officer, or uses any sound-truck or similar device or resorts to any other demonstration in or near any such building or residence, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Nothing in this section shall interfere with or prevent the exercise by any court of the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof of its power to punish for contempt.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 302 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 302: See note following RCW 9.41.010.